Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.160

Time for appearance.

The parties shall be entitled to one hour in which to make their appearance after the time mentioned in the summons or notice for appearance, but shall not be required to remain longer than that time, unless both parties appear; and the justice being present, is actually engaged in the trial of another action or proceeding; in such case he or she may postpone the time of appearance until the close of such trial.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3010; 1957 c 89 s 1; Code 1881 s 1755; 1873 p 344 s 54; 1854 p 230 s 42; RRS s 1773.]